Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1996HV (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 166 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0r. Be subject to and comply with the 3 requirements of section 279.87 relating to the display of the 4 national motto and the state motto in the same manner as a 5 school district. 6 Sec. 2. Section 256E.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 7 following new subsection: 8 NEW SUBSECTION . 6A. A charter school shall start each day 9 of classroom instruction by allowing students two minutes of 10 silent time. 11 Sec. 3. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 12 by adding the following new paragraph: 13 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the 14 requirements of section 279.87 relating to the display of the 15 national motto and the state motto in the same manner as a 16 school district. 17 Sec. 4. Section 256F.4, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 18 following new subsection: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 5A. A charter school or innovation zone 20 school shall start each day of classroom instruction by 21 allowing students two minutes of silent time. 22 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 279.87 Display of national motto and 23 state motto. 24 The board of directors of a school district shall display 25 the national motto of the United States, established under 36 26 U.S.C. Â§302, and the state motto of Iowa, established under 27 section 1A.1, in the main entryway of each attendance center in 28 the school district or in another location within an attendance 29 center if the board of directors of the school district 30 determines that such location is more visible to students. 31 Sec. 6. Section 280.5, Code 2025, is amended to read as 32 follows: 33 280.5 Display of United States flag and Iowa state flag ââ 34 silent time ââ pledge of allegiance. 35 -1- LSB 1996HV (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 2 H.F. 166 1. The board of directors of each public school district 1 and the authorities in charge of each nonpublic school shall 2 provide and maintain a suitable flagstaff on each school site 3 under its control, and the United States flag and the Iowa 4 state flag shall be raised on all school days when weather 5 conditions are suitable. 6 2. The board of directors of each public school district 7 shall administer the pledge of allegiance in grades one through 8 twelve each school day. Immediately prior to the recitation 9 of the pledge of allegiance, each student shall be allowed two 10 minutes of silent time. Each classroom in which the pledge of 11 allegiance is recited pursuant to this subsection shall display 12 the United States flag during the recitation. A student shall 13 not be compelled against the studentâs objections or those of 14 the studentâs parent or guardian to recite the pledge. 15